Hawaii statutes.
[§431:8-321] Nonresident licensing.
(a) Except as provided in section 431:8-317, a nonresident applicant shall
receive a nonresident surplus lines broker license if:

(1) The applicant is currently licensed and is in
good standing as a resident surplus lines broker in the applicant's home state;

(2) The applicant has submitted the proper request
for licensure and has paid the fees required by section 431:7-101;

(3) The applicant has submitted or transmitted to the
commissioner the application for licensure that the applicant submitted to the
applicant's home state, or in lieu of the same, a completed uniform
application; and

(4) The applicant's home state awards nonresident
surplus lines broker licenses to residents of this State on the same basis.

(b) The commissioner may verify the surplus
lines broker's licensing status through the producer database maintained by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates, or its
subsidiaries.

(c) A nonresident surplus lines broker who moves
from one state to another state or a resident surplus lines broker who moves
from this State to another state shall file a change of address with the
commissioner and shall provide certification from the new resident state within
thirty days of the change of legal residence. No fee or license application
shall be required. Failure to timely inform the commissioner of a change in
address shall result in a penalty pursuant to section 431:2-203. [L 2012, c 66,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next